Maryland, session 2026, HB1486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1486*

HOUSE BILL 1486
Article – Labor and Employment
9–602.
(A–1) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE WHO:
(I) WAS CONCURRENTLY EMPLOYED BY MORE THAN ONE
EMPLOYER AT THE TIME OF:
1. THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY; OR
2. THE LAST INJURIOUS EXPOSURE OF THE COVERED
EMPLOYEE TO THE HAZARDS OF AN OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE; AND
(II) AS A RESULT OF THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY OR
OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE, IS UNABLE TO WORK AT ANY EMPLOYMENT THE COVERED
EMPLOYEE WAS ENGAGED IN AT THE TIME OF THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY
OR LAST INJURIOUS EXPOSURE.
(2) THE GROSS WEEKLY WAGES FROM THE EMPLOYMENTS THE
COVERED EMPLOYEE WAS ENGAGED IN AT THE TIME OF THE ACCIDENTAL
PERSONAL INJURY OR LAST INJURIOUS EXPOSURE SHALL BE COMBINED FOR
PURPOSES OF COMPUTING THE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE OF THE COVERED
EMPLOYEE.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO CREATE
LIABILITY TO PAY COMPENSATION ON THE PART OF ANOTHER EMPLOYER IN WHOSE
EMPLOYMENT THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY OR LAST INJURIOUS EXPOSURE
DID NOT OCCUR.
(c) For the purpose of computing the average weekly wage of an individual
engaged for fire fighting by the Department of Natural Resources who is a covered employee
under § 9–207 of this title, the wages of the covered employee shall be:
(1) the greater of:
(i) any salary or wages received by the covered employee for fire
fighting; or
(ii) [any salary or wages earned by the covered employee in other
employment at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure] IF
APPLICABLE, THE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE CALCULATED UNDER SUBSECTION (A–1)
OF THIS SECTION; or

HOUSE BILL 1486 3
(2) if the covered employee did not receive wages for fire fighting or from
other employment at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure,
an amount that allows the minimum compensation or death benefits under this title.
[(l) (1) This subsection applies only to a covered employee who:
(i) has suffered:
1. a serious permanent partial disability under § 9–630 of
this subtitle; or
2. a permanent total disability under § 9–637 of this subtitle;
(ii) was concurrently employed by more than one employer at the
time of the accidental personal injury;
(iii) worked, on average, 20 hours per week or less in the employment
in which the accidental personal injury occurred; and
(iv) as a result of the accidental personal injury, is unable to work at
any employment the covered employee was engaged in at the time of the accidental
personal injury or any similar type of employment.
(2) (i) If the covered employee earned weekly wages from another
employment that exceeded the weekly wages the covered employee earned from the
employment in which the accidental personal injury occurred, the average weekly wage of
the covered employee shall be based on the weekly wages the covered employee earned in
the other employment.
(ii) If the covered employee earned weekly wages from two or more
other employments and, for more than one of such employments, the weekly wages earned
by the employee exceeded the weekly wages of the covered employee from the employment
in which the accidental personal injury occurred, the average weekly wage of the covered
employee shall be based on weekly wages of the employment where the employee earned
the highest wages.
(3) This subsection may not be interpreted as:
(i) except as provided in §§ 9–630 and 9–637 of this subtitle,
relieving from liability to pay compensation the employer in whose employment the
accidental personal injury occurred;
(ii) creating any liability to pay compensation on the part of another
employer in whose employment the accidental personal injury did not occur; or

HOUSE BILL 1486
(iii) requiring the weekly wages from the employments the employee
was engaged in at the time of the accidental personal injury to be combined for purposes of
computing the average weekly wage of the covered employee.]
9–630.
(b) (1) This subsection applies to the payment of weekly compensation
required under subsection (a) of this section if the average weekly wage of a covered
employee is computed under [§ 9–602(l)] § 9–602(A–1) of this subtitle.
(2) The employer in whose employment the accidental personal injury OR
LAST INJURIOUS EXPOSURE TO THE OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE occurred, or the
employer’s insurer, shall pay the covered employee weekly compensation that is based on
the weekly wages of the covered employee at the employment in which the covered
employee was injured OR LAST EXPOSED.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, any additional weekly
compensation resulting from computing the average weekly wage based on weekly wages
earned by the covered employee in other employment shall be payable in the first instance
by the employer in whose employment the employee was injured OR LAST EXPOSED, or
the employer’s insurer.
(4) Subject to any right of the Subsequent Injury Fund to be impleaded or
any right of the Subsequent Injury Fund to defend in a case involving payment from the
Subsequent Injury Fund created under Title 10, Subtitle 2 of this article, as allowable under
Subtitle 8 of this title, the Subsequent Injury Fund shall reimburse the employer in whose
employment the employee was injured OR LAST EXPOSED, or the employer’s insurer, the
amount of additional weekly compensation paid by the employer or insurer under
paragraph (3) of this subsection.
9–637.
(c) (1) This subsection applies to the payment of weekly compensation
required under subsection (a) of this section if the average weekly wage of a covered
employee is computed under [§ 9–602(l)] § 9–602(A–1) of this subtitle.
(2) The employer in whose employment the accidental personal injury OR
LAST INJURIOUS EXPOSURE TO THE OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE occurred, or the
employer’s insurer, shall pay the covered employee weekly compensation that is based on
the weekly wages of the covered employee at the employment in which the covered
employee was injured OR LAST EXPOSED.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, any additional weekly
compensation resulting from computing the average weekly wage based on weekly wages
earned by the covered employee in other employment shall be payable in the first instance

HOUSE BILL 1486 5
by the employer in whose employment the employee was injured OR LAST EXPOSED, or
the employer’s insurer.
(4) Subject to any right of the Subsequent Injury Fund to be impleaded or
any right of the Subsequent Injury Fund to defend in a case involving payment from the
Subsequent Injury Fund created under Title 10, Subtitle 2 of this article, as allowable under
Subtitle 8 of this title, the Subsequent Injury Fund shall reimburse the employer in whose
employment the employee was injured OR LAST EXPOSED, or the employer’s insurer, the
amount of additional weekly compensation paid by the employer or insurer under
paragraph (3) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any claim arising from events occurring before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.